West Virginia, session 2026, HB5074.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: article 9.  tax on medical cannabis. §16A-9-2.  Medical Cannabis Program Fund. (a) Fund established. — The Medical Cannabis Program Fund is established as a special fund in the State Treasury. Money in the fund shall be allocated as set forth in subsection (c) of this section. Any amount unspent at the end of a fiscal year shall be allocated to the bureau for its operations.(b) Source of funds. — Fees and taxes payable under this act shall be deposited into the fund. The money deposited into the fund may only be used for the purposes set forth in this section. Any interest accrued shall be deposited into the fund.(c) Use of proceeds. —  (1) On June 30, 2026, $5 million from the balance of moneys in the fund shall be allocated to the Supreme Court of Appeals for a pilot project for the establishment of a Child Protection Commission and $5 million from the balance of moneys in the fund shall be allocated to Division of Primary Care to expand and enhance services addressing homelessness. The remaining balance in the fund shall revert to general revenue for appropriation;(2) Beginning  of July 1, 2026, the money in the fund is allocated in accordance with the following percentages, except as otherwise provided in this subdivision: (A) Fifteen  percent of the revenue in the fund shall be allocated to the Office of Medical Cannabis for administrative purposes; (B) Fifteen percent shall be allocated to the Department of Agriculture for testing of medical cannabis, which shall occur at the West Virginia State University lab when operational;(C) Twenty percent shall be allocated to the Fight Substance Abuse Fund created by §60A-9-8 of this code;(D) Ten percent shall be allocated to Marshall University for cannabis research; (E) Ten percent shall be allocated to West Virginia University’s Rockefeller Neuroscience Institute for substance use disorder research;(F) Ten percent shall be allocated to the Supreme Court of Appeals for the purposes of a Child Protection Commission; and(G) Twenty percent shall be allocated to the Division of Administrative Services, Justice and Community Services section, for grants to local law enforcement agencies for training, drug diversion, and other programs focused on crime and addiction and to pay expenses of the division in administering the grant program, which expenses may not in any fiscal year exceed three percent of the funds allocated, pursuant to and in accordance with the provisions of §15A-2-1 et seq. of this code.The Clerk of the House of Delegates and the Clerk of the Senate hereby certify that the foregoing bill is correctly enrolled.  ............................................................... Clerk of the House of Delegates  		............................................................... Clerk of the Senate				                  Originated in the House of Delegates. In effect 90 days from passage.    				............................................................... Speaker of the House of Delegates  						............................................................... President of the Senate  __________   	The within is ................................................ this the........................................... Day of ..........................................................................................................., 2026.  				.............................................................								Governor Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home